Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB998.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Nurse Education Capacity Expansion Grant Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Application." An application developed and submitted under section 5."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Faculty" or "faculty assistant." As defined under 49 Pa. 1234567891011121314151617 Code Ch. 21 (relating to State Board of Nursing)."Grant." A grant awarded under this act."Program." The Nurse Education Capacity Expansion Grant Program established under section 3.Section 3. Establishment and eligibility.(a) Establishment.--The Nurse Education Capacity Expansion Grant Program is established in the department for the purpose of expanding the capacity of accredited nursing education programs to increase the number of qualified students.(b) Grant eligibility.--An eligible nursing education program shall have:(1) Accreditation as a nursing educational program by the State Board of Nursing.(2) Operated with graduating classes for at least three years.(3) A graduation rate at the time of application of no less than 70%.(4) A pass rate of no less than 80% among eligible nursing students on the National Council Licensure Examination - NCLEX in the prior year to application.(5) An 80% job placement for graduating nursing students within one year of graduation for the class prior to the date of application.(6) The appropriate training curriculum and facilities to educate nursing students.(7) The appropriate competencies to provide nursing education for nursing students.(c) Grant amount.--No grant may exceed $500,000 to any one nursing education program during the length of the program.Section 4. Uses of grant.20250SB0998PN1216 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The nursing education program application shall include a detailed explanation of the proposed use of the grant. Proposed uses may include:(1) Addition of new faculty or faculty assistants, including full-time or part-time positions.(2) Adjustments to faculty compensation packages to be able to competitively recruit or retain full-time or part-time instructors.(3) Scholarships for faculty development.(4) Improvement of clinical partnerships and preceptorship programs.Section 5. Administration.The department shall develop a standard application for the program and publish guidelines for the administration of the program. The department shall prioritize grant applications from eligible nursing school providers that serve underrepresented student populations or underserved communities.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0998PN1216 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819